Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.200

Exceptions to report—Service of notice on absentee.

The report of the referee may be excepted to by either party to the suit, or to the proceedings before the referee, in like manner and with like effect as in ordinary cases. If a lien creditor be absent from the state, or his or her residence therein be unknown, and that fact appear by affidavit, the court or judge thereof may by order direct that service of the notice may be made upon his or her agent or attorney of record, or by publication thereof, for such time and in such manner as the order may prescribe.

[ 2011 c 336 s 227; Code 1881 s 571; 1877 p 120 s 574; 1869 p 137 s 524; RRS s 857.]